Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.097

Provisional emergency services provider certification—Eligibility.

(1) Emergency medical services providers who are currently licensed or certified in another state or who hold a current certification from a national certifying agency approved by the department [of health] are eligible for a Washington provisional emergency services provider certification.

(2) To be eligible for a Washington provisional emergency services provider certification, the applicant shall:

(a) Be currently licensed or certified in another state and be in good standing with the emergency medical services board of that state or hold a current emergency medical services provider certification from a national certifying agency approved by the department [of health];

(b) Be employed or have a valid employment offer from a Washington emergency medical services agency; and

(c) Be approved for a provisional status from the county medical program director in which the applicant is or will be employed.

(3) If the employer or host agency has:

(a) Fewer than 25 employees holding a current emergency medical technician or paramedic certification or license, up to 20 percent of those employees, rounded to the next whole number, may practice under a provisional certification; or

(b) Twenty-five or more employees holding a current emergency medical technician or paramedic certification or license, up to 10 percent of those employees, rounded to the next whole number, may practice under a provisional certification.

[ 2022 c 136 s 2.]